Florida, session 2026, SB1272.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 32 33 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âSave Our Teachers 34 Act.â 35 Section 2.âSubsection (14) of section 1011.62, Florida 36 Statutes, is amended to read: 37 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 38 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 39 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 40 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 41 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 42 follows: 43 (14)âCLASSROOM TEACHER AND OTHER INSTRUCTIONAL PERSONNEL 44 SALARY INCREASE.â 45 (a)âThe Legislature shall annually apportion an amount of 46 funds provided in the Florida Education Finance Program to: 47 1.âAssist school districts and charter schools in their 48 compliance with the requirement that the minimum base salary for 49 full-time classroom teachers, as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a), 50 and certified prekindergarten teachers funded in the Florida 51 Education Finance Program is at least $65,000 $47,500 or to 52 provide salary increases to instructional personnel, as defined 53 in s. 1012.01(2)(a)-(d), in a manner that best meets the needs 54 of the school district or charter school. 55 2.âAssist with school districts and charter schools in 56 addressing salary compression pursuant to this subsection and s. 57 1012.22(1)(c). 58 3.âProvide funding for an annual cost-of-living adjustment 59 and longevity pay for experienced teachers. 60 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to substitute teachers. 61 The amount and distribution methodology for the funding shall be 62 specified in the General Appropriations Act, including a 63 methodology that accounts for the number of experienced teachers 64 and their years of service. The allocation must be sufficient to 65 adjust the entire salary schedule. 66 (c)(a)âThe term âminimum base salaryâ means the lowest 67 annual base salary reported on the salary schedule for a full 68 time classroom teacher, with additional considerations for 69 regional economic conditions and salary progression for 70 experienced classroom teachers. A full-time classroom teacher 71 may not receive a salary less than the minimum base salary as 72 adjusted by this subsection. 73 (d)(b)âA school district or charter school shall maintain 74 the minimum base salary achieved for classroom teachers provided 75 in the prior fiscal year and may not reduce the salary increases 76 in any subsequent fiscal year. 77 (e)(c)âBefore distributing any additional funds received 78 over the prior fiscal year, each school district and each 79 charter school shall develop a salary distribution plan that 80 clearly delineates the planned distribution of funds in 81 accordance with modified salary schedules, as necessary, for the 82 implementation of this subsection. 83 1.âEach school district superintendent and each charter 84 school administrator must submit its proposed salary 85 distribution plan to the district school board or the charter 86 school governing body, as appropriate, for approval. 87 2.âEach school district shall submit the approved district 88 salary distribution plan and the approved salary distribution 89 plan for each charter school in the district to the department 90 by October 1 of each fiscal year. 91 (f)1.(d)âBeginning August 1, 2026 2024, and each year 92 thereafter, in a format specified by the department, each school 93 district shall provide a report to the department that includes 94 a detailed summary explaining the school districtâs prior yearâs 95 expenditures pursuant to this subsection. The report must 96 include: 97 a.âThe amount of the increase to the minimum base salary 98 for classroom teachers and the school districtâs salary schedule 99 for the prior fiscal year and the fiscal year in which the base 100 salary is increased. 101 b.âThe use of supplemental funds from state teacher 102 compensation grants established under paragraph (i), if 103 applicable, and the outcomes of efforts to address pay 104 compression. 105 c.âDistrict-specific progress as determined under the 106 departmentâs phased implementation plan pursuant to paragraph 107 (h). 108 2.âEach charter school governing board shall submit the 109 information required under this subparagraph to the district 110 school board for inclusion in the school districtâs report to 111 the department. 112 (g)(e)âAlthough district school boards and charter school 113 governing boards are not precluded from bargaining over wages, 114 the classroom teacher and other instructional personnel salary 115 increase must be used solely to comply with the requirements of 116 this subsection. A district school board or charter school 117 governing board that is unable to meet the reporting 118 requirements in paragraph (f) (d) due to a collective bargaining 119 impasse must provide written notification to the department or 120 the district school board, as applicable, detailing the reasons 121 for the impasse with a proposed timeline and details for a 122 resolution. 123 (h)1.âBeginning August 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, 124 in a format prescribed by the department, each school district 125 shall provide to the department a localized salary adjustment 126 plan to address pay compression and provide equitable 127 compensation to experienced teachers while considering the 128 unique economic condition and fiscal capacity of the school 129 district. The plan must include the following: 130 a.âThe step-based salary increases included in the school 131 districtâs performance-based salary schedule. 132 b.âAn analysis of the school districtâs economic conditions 133 and the districtâs plan to adjust salary schedules and salary 134 increases accordingly to reflect differences in the local cost 135 of living, property tax revenue, and state funding allocations. 136 c.âAny state-level support provided to the district to help 137 address pay compression. 138 2.âEach charter school governing board shall submit to the 139 district school board the information required under 140 subparagraph 1. for inclusion in the school districtâs plan. 141 3.âThe department shall establish and oversee a phased 142 implementation of the requirements of this paragraph and 143 paragraph (i). The phased implementation must: 144 a.âPrioritize smaller school districts and charter schools 145 and those with the greatest financial need or teacher retention 146 challenges in the initial phase. 147 b.âEstablish a timeline to phase in the requirements of 148 this paragraph to larger school districts. 149 c.âEnsure that the requirements of this paragraph are fully 150 implemented by the 2030-2031 school year. 151 d.âInclude an annual needs assessment for each school 152 district and charter school to determine funding priorities and 153 adjust the phased timeline as necessary. 154 e.âNotwithstanding any other provision of law to the 155 contrary, coordinate the integration of funding sources to meet 156 the requirements of this subsection and s. 1012.22(1)(c), 157 including: 158 (I)âRedirected lottery revenue. 159 (II)âPublic-private partnerships. 160 (III)âAdministrative efficiency savings. 161 (IV)âGrants and tourism-linked revenue. 162 4.âThe department shall require school districts and 163 charter schools to annually report on the impacts of the plan 164 under subparagraph 1. and use the data from such reports to 165 refine its implementation strategy. 166 (i)âThe department shall provide state teacher compensation 167 grants to smaller school districts and charter schools that have 168 limited financial resources for the purpose of supplementing 169 local budgets to help such school districts and charter schools 170 meet pay differential goals without compromising other essential 171 services. 172 Section 3.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) and paragraph 173 (b) of subsection (3) of section 1012.22, Florida Statutes, are 174 amended to read: 175 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 176 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 177 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 178 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 179 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 180 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 181 chapter: 182 (c)âCompensation and salary schedules.â 183 1.âDefinitions.âAs used in this paragraph: 184 a.ââAdjustmentâ means an addition to the base salary 185 schedule that is not a bonus and becomes part of the employeeâs 186 permanent base salary and shall be considered compensation under 187 s. 121.021(22). 188 b.ââGrandfathered salary scheduleâ means the salary 189 schedule or schedules adopted by a district school board before 190 July 1, 2014, pursuant to subparagraph 4. 191 c.ââInstructional personnelâ means instructional personnel 192 as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a)-(d), excluding substitute 193 teachers. 194 d.ââPerformance salary scheduleâ means the salary schedule 195 or schedules adopted by a district school board pursuant to 196 subparagraph 5. 197 e.ââSalary scheduleâ means the schedule or schedules used 198 to provide the base salary for district school board personnel. 199 f.ââSchool administratorâ means a school administrator as 200 defined in s. 1012.01(3)(c). 201 g.ââSupplementâ means an annual addition to the base salary 202 for the term of the negotiated supplement as long as the 203 employee continues his or her employment for the purpose of the 204 supplement. A supplement does not become part of the employeeâs 205 continuing base salary but shall be considered compensation 206 under s. 121.021(22). 207 2.âCost-of-living adjustment.âA district school board may 208 provide a cost-of-living salary adjustment if the adjustment: 209 a.âDoes not discriminate among comparable classes of 210 employees based upon the salary schedule under which they are 211 compensated. 212 b.âDoes not exceed 50 percent of the annual adjustment 213 provided to instructional personnel rated as effective. 214 3.âAdvanced degrees.âA district school board may use 215 advanced degrees in setting a salary schedule for instructional 216 personnel or school administrators if the advanced degree is 217 held in the individualâs area of certification. 218 4.âGrandfathered salary schedule.â 219 a.âThe district school board shall adopt a salary schedule 220 or salary schedules to be used as the basis for paying all 221 school employees hired before July 1, 2014. Instructional 222 personnel on annual contract as of July 1, 2014, shall be placed 223 on the performance salary schedule adopted under subparagraph 5. 224 Instructional personnel on continuing contract or professional 225 service contract may opt into the performance salary schedule if 226 the employee relinquishes such contract and agrees to be 227 employed on an annual contract under s. 1012.335. Such an 228 employee shall be placed on the performance salary schedule and 229 may not return to continuing contract or professional service 230 contract status. Any employee who opts into the performance 231 salary schedule may not return to the grandfathered salary 232 schedule. 233 b.âIn determining the grandfathered salary schedule for 234 instructional personnel, a district school board must base a 235 portion of each employeeâs compensation upon performance 236 demonstrated under s. 1012.34 and shall provide differentiated 237 pay for both instructional personnel and school administrators 238 based upon district-determined factors, including, but not 239 limited to, additional responsibilities, school demographics, 240 high-demand teacher needs areas, and level of job performance 241 difficulties. 242 5.âPerformance salary schedule.âBy July 1, 2014, the 243 district school board shall adopt a performance salary schedule 244 that provides annual salary adjustments for instructional 245 personnel and school administrators based upon performance 246 determined under s. 1012.34. Employees hired on or after July 1, 247 2014, or employees who choose to move from the grandfathered 248 salary schedule to the performance salary schedule shall be 249 compensated pursuant to the performance salary schedule once 250 they have received the appropriate performance evaluation for 251 this purpose. Each school district shall ensure that salary 252 structures promote fairness and livable wages while adapting to 253 local economic factors. Each school district shall collaborate 254 with local stakeholders, including classroom teachers and 255 community representatives, to ensure the performance salary 256 schedule addresses regional disparities and teacher retention. A 257 school district may not unilaterally implement changes to the 258 performance salary schedule which exacerbate salary inequities 259 for instructional personnel or school administrators and shall, 260 during any collective bargaining negotiations of salary 261 schedules, tailor solutions to the needs of instructional 262 personnel and school administrators. 263 a.âBase salary.âThe base salary shall be established as 264 follows: 265 (I)âThe base salary for instructional personnel or school 266 administrators who opt into the performance salary schedule 267 shall be the salary paid in the prior year, including 268 adjustments only. 269 (II)âInstructional personnel or school administrators new 270 to the district, returning to the district after a break in 271 service without an authorized leave of absence, or appointed for 272 the first time to a position in the district in the capacity of 273 instructional personnel or school administrator shall be placed 274 on the performance salary schedule. 275 b.âStep-based salary increases.âStep-based salary increases 276 shall be established within the performance-based salary 277 schedule to offer consistent and predictable salary increases 278 based on the years of experience of instructional personnel or 279 school administrators. Such increases must be higher for the 280 instructional personnel and school administrators with more 281 years of experience and must align with the school districtâs 282 fiscal capacity, cost of living, and teacher retention needs and 283 meet the following minimum requirements: 284 (I)âFor instructional personnel or school administrators 285 with at least 5 years of experience but not more than 10 years 286 of experience with the school district, a minimum pay increase 287 of $1,500 per year. 288 (II)âFor instructional personnel or school administrators 289 with at least 10 years of experience but not more than 20 years 290 of experience with the school district, a minimum pay increase 291 of $2,000 per year. 292 (III)âFor instructional personnel or school administrators 293 with at least 20 years of experience with the school district, a 294 minimum pay increase of $3,000 per year. 295 c.b.âSalary adjustments.âSalary adjustments for highly 296 effective or effective performance shall be established as 297 follows: 298 (I)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 299 salary schedule for an employee rated as highly effective must 300 be at least 25 percent greater than the highest annual salary 301 adjustment available to an employee of the same classification 302 through any other salary schedule adopted by the district. 303 (II)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 304 salary schedule for an employee rated as effective must be equal 305 to at least 50 percent and no more than 75 percent of the annual 306 adjustment provided for a highly effective employee of the same 307 classification. 308 (III)âA salary schedule shall not provide an annual salary 309 adjustment for an employee who receives a rating other than 310 highly effective or effective for the year. 311 d.c.âSalary supplements.âIn addition to the salary 312 adjustments, each district school board shall provide for salary 313 supplements for activities that must include, but are not 314 limited to: 315 (I)âAssignment to a Title I eligible school. 316 (II)âAssignment to a school that earned a grade of âFâ or 317 three consecutive grades of âDâ pursuant to s. 1008.34 such that 318 the supplement remains in force for at least 1 year following 319 improved performance in that school. 320 (III)âCertification and teaching in high-demand teacher 321 needs areas. Statewide high-demand teacher needs areas shall be 322 identified by the State Board of Education under s. 1012.07. 323 However, the district school board may identify other areas of 324 high-demand needs within the school district for purposes of 325 this sub-sub-subparagraph and may remove areas identified by the 326 state board which do not apply within the school district. 327 (IV)âAssignment of additional academic responsibilities, 328 including as a department chair, an instructional coach, or a 329 mentor to instructional personnel. 330 e.âCompression relief supplements.â 331 (I)âIn addition to the salary adjustments and step-based 332 salary increases, each district school board shall provide for a 333 compression relief supplement for experienced instructional 334 personnel and school administrators. Such supplements may be a 335 one-time supplement that occurs when instructional personnel or 336 school administrators reach a specified number of years of 337 employment with the school district or may be recurring 338 increases for instructional personnel and school administrators 339 who reach specified years of employment with the school 340 district. 341 (II)âThe Department of Education shall provide school 342 districts with guidelines for the equitable implementation of 343 compression relief supplements. Each school district shall 344 annually conduct an audit of its performance salary schedule to 345 identify and address salary compression issues. 346 f.âRetention incentives for experienced instructional 347 personnel.âEach district school board shall provide a retention 348 incentive for instructional personnel with significant years of 349 service with the district. Such incentives must be awarded as 350 follows: 351 (I)âInstructional personnel who have at least 10 years of 352 service but less than 20 years of service shall be awarded an 353 incentive of $5,000. 354 (II)âInstructional personnel who have at least 20 years of 355 service with the school district shall be awarded an incentive 356 of $10,000. 357 358 If budget constraints in any given year limit a district school 359 boardâs ability to fully fund all adopted salary schedules, the 360 performance salary schedule shall not be reduced on the basis of 361 total cost or the value of individual awards in a manner that is 362 proportionally greater than reductions to any other salary 363 schedules adopted by the district. Any compensation for 364 longevity of service awarded to instructional personnel who are 365 on any other salary schedule must be included in calculating the 366 salary adjustments required by sub-subparagraph b. 367 (3) 368 (b)âAppearances before the board.âIf a district school 369 superintendent appears before the state board to provide an 370 update under s. 1011.62(14)(g) s. 1011.62(14)(e), the state 371 board must require that the president of the collective 372 bargaining unit that represents the school district also must 373 appear. 374 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.